test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-naartal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - naartâl contract stem haapana: # Noun - full paradigm
     naartâl+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: naartâl
     naartâl+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: narttâl
     naartâl+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: narttâl
     naartâl+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: narttla
     naartâl+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: narttlest
     naartâl+N+Sg+Com+Indef: narttlin
     naartâl+N+Ess+Indef: narttlen
     naartâl+N+Par+Indef: narttled
     naartâl+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [narttâltaa, narttâltää]
     naartâl+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: narttâl
     naartâl+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: narttli
     naartâl+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: narttlid
     naartâl+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: narttlid
     naartâl+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: narttlin
     naartâl+N+Pl+Com+Indef: narttlivuiʹm
     naartâl+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [narttlitaa, narttlitää]
